test/src/morphology/N-lilla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lilla: # Noun 56 'eng /est lilla/fin' - full paradigm
     lilla+N+Sg+Nom: lilla
     lilla+N+Sg+Gen: lilla
     lilla+N+Sg+Par: lilla
     lilla+N+Sg+Dat: lillan
     lilla+N+Sg+Ins: lillaks
     lilla+N+Sg+Ill: lillaz
     lilla+N+Sg+Ela: lillast
     lilla+N+Pl+Nom: lillad
     lilla+N+Pl+Gen: lillad
     lilla+N+Pl+Par: lillidi
     lilla+N+Pl+Dat: lilladõn
     lilla+N+Pl+Ins: lilladõks
     lilla+N+Pl+Ill: lilliž
     lilla+N+Pl+Ela: lillist
